Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 129
INDEMNIFICATION

Cross references:

For definitions applicable to this article, see §§ 7-90-102 and 7-121-401.

Law reviews:

For article, "Indemnification Provisions in

C

ommercial

C

ontracts: A Drafting Primer", see 49 Colo. Law. 28 (Jan. 2020).

Section

7-129-101. Indemnification definitions.

As used in this article:

"Director" means an individual who is or was a director of a nonprofit corporation or an individual who, while a director of a nonprofit corporation, is or was serving at the nonprofit corporation's request as a director, officer, partner, member, manager, trustee, employee, fiduciary, or agent of another domestic or foreign entity or of an employee benefit plan. A director is considered to be serving an employee benefit plan at the nonprofit corporation's request if the director's duties to the nonprofit corporation also impose duties on, or otherwise involve services by, the director to the plan or to participants in or beneficiaries of the plan. "Director" includes, unless the context requires otherwise, the estate or personal representative of a deceased director.

"Expenses" includes counsel fees.

"Liability" means the obligation incurred with respect to a proceeding to pay a judgment, settlement, penalty, fine, including an excise tax assessed with respect to an employee benefit plan, or reasonable expenses.

"Nonprofit corporation" includes any domestic or foreign entity that is a predecessor of a nonprofit corporation by reason of a merger or other transaction in which the predecessor's existence ceased upon consummation of the transaction.

"Official capacity" means, when used with respect to a director, the office of director in a nonprofit corporation and, when used with respect to a person other than a director as contemplated in section 7-129-107, the office in a nonprofit corporation held by the officer or the employment, fiduciary, or agency relationship undertaken by the employee, fiduciary, or agent on behalf of the nonprofit corporation. "Official capacity" does not include service for any other domestic or foreign corporation, nonprofit corporation, or other person or employee benefit plan.

"Party" includes a person who was, is, or is threatened to be made a named defendant or respondent in a proceeding.

"Proceeding" means any threatened, pending, or completed action, suit, or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, or investigative and whether formal or informal.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 701, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 2342, § 309, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1511, § 302, effective July 1.

7-129-102. Authority to indemnify directors.

Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a nonprofit corporation may indemnify a person made a party to a proceeding because the person is or was a director against liability incurred in the proceeding if:

The person's conduct was in good faith; and

The person reasonably believed:

In the case of conduct in an official capacity with the nonprofit corporation, that the conduct was in the nonprofit corporation's best interests; and

In all other cases, that the conduct was at least not opposed to the nonprofit corporation's best interests; and

In the case of any criminal proceeding, the person had no reasonable cause to believe the conduct was unlawful.

A director's conduct with respect to an employee benefit plan for a purpose the director reasonably believed to be in the interests of the participants in or beneficiaries of the plan is conduct that satisfies the requirement of subparagraph (II) of paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section. A director's conduct with respect to an employee benefit plan for a purpose that the director did not reasonably believe to be in the interests of the participants in or beneficiaries of the plan shall be deemed not to satisfy the requirements of paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section.

The termination of a proceeding by judgment, order, settlement, or conviction or upon a plea of nolo contendere or its equivalent is not, of itself, determinative that the director did not meet the standard of conduct described in this section.

A nonprofit corporation may not indemnify a director under this section:

In connection with a proceeding by or in the right of the nonprofit corporation in which the director was adjudged liable to the nonprofit corporation; or

In connection with any other proceeding charging that the director derived an improper personal benefit, whether or not involving action in an official capacity, in which proceeding the director was adjudged liable on the basis that the director derived an improper personal benefit.

Indemnification permitted under this section in connection with a proceeding by or in the right of the nonprofit corporation is limited to reasonable expenses incurred in connection with the proceeding.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 702, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

7-129-103. Mandatory indemnification of directors.

Unless limited by its articles of incorporation, a nonprofit corporation shall indemnify a person who was wholly successful, on the merits or otherwise, in the defense of any proceeding to which the person was a party because the person is or was a director, against reasonable expenses incurred by the person in connection with the proceeding.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 703, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

7-129-104. Advance of expenses to directors.

A nonprofit corporation may pay for or reimburse the reasonable expenses incurred by a director who is a party to a proceeding in advance of final disposition of the proceeding if:

The director furnishes to the nonprofit corporation a written affirmation of the director's good-faith belief that the director has met the standard of conduct described in section 7-129-102;

The director furnishes to the nonprofit corporation a written undertaking, executed personally or on the director's behalf, to repay the advance if it is ultimately determined that the director did not meet the standard of conduct; and

A determination is made that the facts then known to those making the determination would not preclude indemnification under this article.

The undertaking required by paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section shall be an unlimited general obligation of the director but need not be secured and may be accepted without reference to financial ability to make repayment.

Determinations and authorizations of payments under this section shall be made in the manner specified in section 7-129-106.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 703, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

7-129-105. Court-ordered indemnification of directors.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, a director who is or was a party to a proceeding may apply for indemnification to the court conducting the proceeding or to another court of competent jurisdiction. On receipt of an application, the court, after giving any notice the court considers necessary, may order indemnification in the following manner:

If it determines that the director is entitled to mandatory indemnification under section 7-129-103, the court shall order indemnification, in which case the court shall also order the nonprofit corporation to pay the director's reasonable expenses incurred to obtain court-ordered indemnification.

If it determines that the director is fairly and reasonably entitled to indemnification in view of all the relevant circumstances, whether or not the director met the standard of conduct set forth in section 7-129-102 (1) or was adjudged liable in the circumstances described in section 7-129-102 (4), the court may order such indemnification as the court deems proper; except that the indemnification with respect to any proceeding in which liability shall have been adjudged in the circumstances described in section 7-129-102 (4) is limited to reasonable expenses incurred in connection with the proceeding and reasonable expenses incurred to obtain court-ordered indemnification.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 703, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

7-129-106. Determination and authorization of indemnification of directors.

A nonprofit corporation may not indemnify a director under section 7-129-102 unless authorized in the specific case after a determination has been made that indemnification of the director is permissible in the circumstances because the director has met the standard of conduct set forth in section 7-129-102. A nonprofit corporation shall not advance expenses to a director under section 7-129-104 unless authorized in the specific case after the written affirmation and undertaking required by section 7-129-104 (1)(a) and (1)(b) are received and the determination required by section 7-129-104 (1)(c) has been made.

The determinations required by subsection (1) of this section shall be made:

By the board of directors by a majority vote of those present at a meeting at which a quorum is present, and only those directors not parties to the proceeding shall be counted in satisfying the quorum; or

If a quorum cannot be obtained, by a majority vote of a committee of the board of directors designated by the board of directors, which committee shall consist of two or more directors not parties to the proceeding; except that directors who are parties to the proceeding may participate in the designation of directors for the committee.

If a quorum cannot be obtained as contemplated in paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of this section, and a committee cannot be established under paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section, or, even if a quorum is obtained or a committee is designated, if a majority of the directors constituting such quorum or such committee so directs, the determination required to be made by subsection (1) of this section shall be made:

By independent legal counsel selected by a vote of the board of directors or the committee in the manner specified in paragraph (a) or (b) of subsection (2) of this section or, if a quorum of the full board cannot be obtained and a committee cannot be established, by independent legal counsel selected by a majority vote of the full board of directors; or

By the voting members, but voting members who are also directors and who are at the time seeking indemnification may not vote on the determination.

Authorization of indemnification and advance of expenses shall be made in the same manner as the determination that indemnification or advance of expenses is permissible; except that, if the determination that indemnification or advance of expenses is permissible is made by independent legal counsel, authorization of indemnification and advance of expenses shall be made by the body that selected such counsel.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 704, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

7-129-107. Indemnification of officers, employees, fiduciaries, and agents.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation:

An officer is entitled to mandatory indemnification under section 7-129-103, and is entitled to apply for court-ordered indemnification under section 7-129-105, in each case to the same extent as a director;

A nonprofit corporation may indemnify and advance expenses to an officer, employee, fiduciary, or agent of the nonprofit corporation to the same extent as to a director; and

A nonprofit corporation may also indemnify and advance expenses to an officer, employee, fiduciary, or agent who is not a director to a greater extent, if not inconsistent with public policy, and if provided for by its bylaws, general or specific action of its board of directors or voting members, or contract.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 705, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

7-129-108. Insurance.

A nonprofit corporation may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of a person who is or was a director, officer, employee, fiduciary, or agent of the nonprofit corporation, or who, while a director, officer, employee, fiduciary, or agent of the nonprofit corporation, is or was serving at the request of the nonprofit corporation as a director, officer, partner, member, manager, trustee, employee, fiduciary, or agent of any domestic or foreign entity or of any employee benefit plan, against liability asserted against or incurred by the person in that capacity or arising from the person's status as a director, officer, employee, fiduciary, or agent, whether or not the nonprofit corporation would have power to indemnify the person against the same liability under section 7-129-102, 7-129-103, or 7-129-107. Any such insurance may be procured from any insurance company designated by the board of directors, whether such insurance company is formed under the law of this state or any other jurisdiction, including any insurance company in which the nonprofit corporation has an equity or any other interest through stock ownership or otherwise.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 705, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2343, § 310, effective July 1, 2004.

7-129-109. Limitation of indemnification of directors.

A provision treating a nonprofit corporation's indemnification of, or advance of expenses to, directors that is contained in its articles of incorporation or bylaws, in a resolution of its members or board of directors, or in a contract, except an insurance policy, or otherwise, is valid only to the extent the provision is not inconsistent with sections 7-129-101 to 7-129-108. If the articles of incorporation limit indemnification or advance of expenses, indemnification and advance of expenses are valid only to the extent not inconsistent with the articles of incorporation.

Sections 7-129-101 to 7-129-108 do not limit a nonprofit corporation's power to pay or reimburse expenses incurred by a director in connection with an appearance as a witness in a proceeding at a time when the director has not been made a named defendant or respondent in the proceeding.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 706, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

7-129-110. Notice to voting members of indemnification of director.

If a nonprofit corporation indemnifies or advances expenses to a director under this article in connection with a proceeding by or in the right of the nonprofit corporation, the nonprofit corporation shall give written notice of the indemnification or advance to the voting members with or before the notice of the next voting members' meeting. If the next voting member action is taken without a meeting at the instigation of the board of directors, such notice shall be given to the voting members at or before the time the first voting member signs a writing consenting to such action.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 706, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.